Kentucky statutes. TITLE III Executive Branch
Criminal Records and Statistics

17.110.
Report of offense under penal code to department.

All city and county law enforcement agencies shall cause a photograph, a set of fingerprints, and a general description report of all persons arrested on a felony charge to be made and two (2) copies of each item forwarded within thirty (30) days after the arrest to the Department of Kentucky State Police of the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet, in accordance with administrative regulations of the cabinet. Unless the charges are dismissed or withdrawn at that appearance, the judge shall require any adult person appearing before any Circuit Court in the Commonwealth on a felony charge, who has not been arrested, to, if this has not already been done in the case before the court, be photographed and fingerprinted, and have a general description made following his arraignment. Agencies specified above shall furnish any other information involving offenses or in their possession relative to law enforcement upon request by the cabinet.

Each city and county law enforcement agency shall advise the Department of Kentucky State Police of the disposition made of all cases wherein a person has been charged with an offense.

History.

Enact. Acts 1958, ch. 129, §§ 1, 2; 1976, ch. 191, § 1; 1992, ch. 427, § 2, effective July 14, 1992; 2007, ch. 85, § 75, effective June 26, 2007.

Opinions of Attorney General.

Although not required, there is no valid objection to fingerprinting in misdemeanor cases.

OAG 64-469

.

Peace officers have no authority to fingerprint, photograph or maintain a record of the criminal offenses of juveniles taken into custody for any public offense with the exception of juveniles 16 years of age or older involved in a “moving motor vehicle offense,” who are treated as adults.

OAG 66-253

.

Since the taking of a child into custody is not an arrest, this section does not apply to a child who is transferred from juvenile court to Circuit Court for trial until after he has been convicted by the latter court, and fingerprinting and photographing him for record purposes prior to that time would be improper.

OAG 66-253

.

Where circumstances exist which allow a juvenile to be tried in Circuit Court, and the juvenile has been convicted in Circuit Court, the defendant may be photographed and fingerprinted even though the offender be a juvenile.

OAG 66-253

.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Law Journal.

Breckinridge, Law Enforcement in Kentucky, Report to the Committee on the Administration of Justice in the Commonwealth of Kentucky, Part IX, State Police, 52 Ky. L.J. 1 (1963).

Stamm, Transfer of Jurisdiction in Juvenile Court: An Analysis of the Proceeding, Its Role in the Administration of Justice, and A Proposal for the Reform of Kentucky Law, 62 Ky. L.J. 122 (1973-1974).

17.115.
Criminal identification activities — State institutions and peace officers to cooperate with cabinet.

The Justice and Public Safety Cabinet shall:

Receive and file fingerprints, photographs, and other records pertaining to the investigation of crime and the apprehension of criminals; and

Cooperate with the state, county, and city law enforcing agencies of other states and of the United States in order to develop and carry on an interstate and national system of criminal identification.

Persons in charge of any penal or correctional institution in the state, and all state law enforcement and peace officers operating identification facilities shall cooperate in providing the cabinet with fingerprints and descriptions of all persons lawfully committed to their custody or detained by them in cases where fingerprints and descriptions are taken, together with a report of the disposition of all cases of such persons.

History.

Enact. Acts 1962, ch. 106, Art. III, § 2; 1974, ch. 74, Art. V, § 24(1); 2007, ch. 85, § 76, effective June 26, 2007.

Opinions of Attorney General.

Although not required, there is no valid objection to fingerprinting in misdemeanor cases.

OAG 64-469

.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Law Journal.

Breckinridge, Law Enforcement in Kentucky, Report to the Committee on the Administration of Justice in the Commonwealth of Kentucky, Part VIII, Peace Officers, 52 Ky. L.J. 1 (1963).

Breckinridge, Law Enforcement in Kentucky, Report to the Committee on the Administration of Justice in the Commonwealth of Kentucky, Part IX, State Police, 52 Ky. L.J. 1 (1963).

17.120.
Forwarding reports to federal government.

The Justice and Public Safety Cabinet shall forward one (1) copy of each photograph, set of fingerprints, and general description report received by it in a criminal case to the Federal Bureau of Investigation.

History.

Enact. Acts 1958, ch. 129, § 3, effective June 19, 1958; 1974, ch. 74, Art. V, § 24(1); 2007, ch. 85, § 77, effective June 26, 2007.

17.125.
Agency sharing of records maintained on juvenile in facility, program, or informal adjustment — Confidentiality — Provision of records — Exception — Violation.

The following agencies are parts of Kentucky’s juvenile justice system and shall, subject to restrictions imposed by state or federal law, disclose and share with each other all information they maintain on a juvenile in a facility or program or informal adjustment authorized by law:

All sheriff’s offices, police departments, and any other law enforcement agency;

All Commonwealth’s attorneys and county attorneys;

The Attorney General;

All jails and juvenile detention facilities, public and private;

All courts and clerks of courts;

The Administrative Office of the Courts;

All departments within the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet;

All departments within the Cabinet for Health and Family Services; and

All family accountability, intervention, and response teams.

Except as provided in this section, all information shared by agencies specified above shall be subject to applicable confidentiality disclosure, redisclosure, and access restrictions imposed by federal or state law.

Once a complaint is filed with a court-designated worker alleging that a child has committed a status offense or public offense, all public or private elementary or secondary schools, vocational or business schools, or institutions of higher education shall provide all records specifically requested in writing, and pertaining to that child, to any of the agencies listed in subsection (1) of this section. Pursuant to the authority granted to the Commonwealth under the Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act, 20

U.S.C. sec. 1232

g, when this section refers to the release of educational records, the purpose of the release shall be limited to providing the juvenile justice system with the ability to effectively serve, prior to adjudication, the needs of the student whose records are sought. The authorities to which the data are released shall certify that any educational records obtained pursuant to this section shall only be released to persons authorized by statute and shall not be released to any other person without the written consent of the parent of the child. The request, certification, and a record of the release shall be maintained in the student’s file.

Any request for records, the provision of records, the sharing of records, the disclosure of records, or the redisclosure of records shall be done for official purposes only, on a bona fide need to know basis, and only in connection with a legitimate investigation, prosecution, treatment program, or educational program.

Information and records relating to pending litigation in Circuit Court, District Court, or a federal court and information and records relating to an ongoing investigation are not subject to disclosure or sharing under this section.

Obtaining or attempting to obtain a record relating to a minor or by sharing or attempting to share a record relating to a minor with an unauthorized person is a violation of this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 606, § 10, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 99, § 14, effective June 20, 2005; 2007, ch. 85, § 78, effective June 26, 2007; 2014, ch. 132, § 54, effective July 15, 2014.

17.130.
Traffic safety coordination committee — Members — Tenure — Compensation — Functions — Powers — Meetings. [Repealed.]

17.131.
Kentucky Unified Criminal Justice Information System — Committee to design and implement system — Uniform policy — Duties — Automated warrant system — Denial of funds upon failure of agency or officer to participate in system.

There is hereby established the Kentucky Unified Criminal Justice Information System, referred to in this chapter as the “system.” The system shall be a joint effort of the criminal justice agencies, the Courts of Justice, and the Office of Homeland Security. Notwithstanding any statutes, administrative regulations, and policies to the contrary, if standards and technologies other than those set by the Commonwealth Office of Technology are required, the executive director of the Commonwealth Office of Technology shall review, expedite, and grant appropriate exemptions to effectuate the purposes of the unified criminal justice information system. Nothing in this section shall be construed to hamper any public officer or official, agency, or organization of state or local government from furnishing information or data that they are required or requested to furnish and which they are allowed to procure by law, to the General Assembly, the Legislative Research Commission, or a committee of either. For the purposes of this section, “criminal justice agencies” include all departments of the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet except the Department of Public Advocacy, the Unified Prosecutorial System, Commonwealth’s attorneys, county attorneys, the Transportation Cabinet, the Cabinet for Health and Family Services, and any agency with the authority to issue a citation or make an arrest.

The program to design, implement, and maintain the system shall be under the supervision of the executive director of the Office of Homeland Security, in consultation with the executive director of the Commonwealth Office of Technology and the Administrative Office of the Courts.

The executive director of the Office of Homeland Security, the executive director of the Commonwealth Office of Technology, and a representative of the Administrative Office of the Courts, or their respective designees, shall be responsible for recommending standards, policies, and other matters to the secretary of justice and public safety for promulgation of administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to implement the policies, standards, and other matters relating to the system and its operation.

The uniform policy shall include a system to enable the criminal justice agencies and the courts to share data stored in each other’s information systems. Initially, the uniform policy shall maximize the use of existing databases and platforms through the use of a virtual database created by network linking of existing databases and platforms among the various departments. The uniform policy shall also develop plans for the new open system platforms before the existing platforms become obsolete.

All criminal justice and participating public safety agencies shall follow the policies established by administrative regulation for the exchange of data and connection to the system.

The executive director of the Commonwealth Office of Technology shall review how changes to existing criminal justice agency applications impact the new integrated network. Changes to criminal justice agency applications that have an impact on the integrated network shall be coordinated through and approved by the executive director of the Office of Homeland Security, in consultation with the Commonwealth Office of Technology.

Any future state-funded expenditures by a criminal justice agency for computer platforms in support of criminal justice applications shall be reviewed by the Office of Homeland Security and the Commonwealth Office of Technology.

As part of the unified criminal justice information system, the executive director of the Office of Homeland Security, in consultation with the secretary of the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet, the executive director of the Commonwealth Office of Technology, and the Administrative Office of the Courts, shall design and implement an automated warrant system. The automated warrant system shall be compatible with any similar system required by the federal government for inclusion of state information in federal criminal justice databases.

Any criminal justice and public safety agency that does not participate in the system may be denied access to state and federal grant funds.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 606, § 28, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 506, § 12, effective July 14, 2000; 2000, ch. 536, § 12, effective July 14, 2000; 2005, ch. 85, § 42, effective June 20, 2005; 2005, ch. 99, § 89, effective June 20, 2005; 2007, ch. 85, § 79, effective June 26, 2007; 2017 ch. 167, § 6, effective June 29, 2017.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(6/26/2007). Although 2007 Ky. Acts ch. 85, sec. 79, contains a reference to the “Department of Public Advocacy,” the entity created by 2007 Ky. Acts ch. 85, secs. 7 and 40, and Executive Order 2006-805 is the “Department for Public Advocacy.” In accordance with 2007 Ky. Acts ch. 85, sec. 335, and KRS

7.136

, the erroneous reference in this section has been corrected in codification.

17.140.
Centralized criminal history record information system.

A centralized criminal history record information system shall be established in the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet under the direction, control and supervision of the commissioner of the Department of Kentucky State Police.

A centralized criminal history records information system means the system including equipment, facilities, procedures, and agreements for the collection, processing, preservation or dissemination of criminal history records maintained by the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet.

History.

Enact. Acts 1968, ch. 128, § 1; 1974, ch. 74, Art. V, § 24(9); 1976, ch. 191, § 2; 2007, ch. 85, § 80, effective June 26, 2007.

17.142.
Segregation of criminal records.

Each law enforcement or other public agency in possession of arrest records, fingerprints, photographs, or other data whether in documentary or electronic form shall upon written request of the arrestee as provided herein segregate all records relating to the arrestee in its files in a file separate and apart from those of convicted persons, if the person who is the subject of the records:

Is found innocent of the offense for which the records were made; or

Has had all charges relating to the offense dismissed; or

Has had all charges relating to the offense withdrawn.

A person who has been arrested and then has come within the purview of subsection (1) of this section may apply to the court in which the case was tried, or in which it would have been tried in the event of a dismissal or withdrawal of charges, for segregation of the records in the case. Upon receipt of such application the court shall forthwith issue an order to all law enforcement agencies in possession of such records to segregate the records in accordance with the provisions of this section.

Each law enforcement agency receiving an order to segregate records shall forthwith:

Segregate the records in its possession in a file separate and apart from records of convicted persons;

Notify all agencies with which it has shared the records or to which it has provided copies of the records to segregate records; and

All records segregated pursuant to this section shall show disposition of the case.

Records subject to the provisions of KRS

431.076

or

431.078

shall be sealed as provided in those statutes.

History.

Enact. Acts 1980, ch. 127, § 1, effective July 15, 1980; 1996, ch. 374, § 2, effective July 15, 1996.

17.143.
Qualified person to administer system — Personnel.

The commissioner shall appoint a qualified person to administer the centralized criminal history record information system. He shall have statistical training and experience and possess a knowledge of criminal law enforcement and administration and of penal and correctional institutions and methods. He shall be furnished with the necessary facilities and equipment and shall appoint clerical and other assistants necessary for the operation of the centralized criminal history record information system.

History.

Enact. Acts 1968, ch. 128, § 2; 1976, ch. 191, § 3.

17.147.
Duties of Department of Kentucky State Police.

The Department of Kentucky State Police shall:

Collect data necessary for the operation of the centralized criminal history record information system from all persons and agencies mentioned in KRS

17.150

;

Prepare and distribute to all such persons and agencies forms to be used in reporting data to the centralized criminal history record information system. The forms shall provide for items of information needed by federal bureaus or departments engaged in the administration of criminal justice programs;

Prescribe the forms and content of records to be kept by such persons and agencies to insure reporting of data to the centralized criminal history record information system;

Instruct such persons and agencies in the installation, maintenance, and use of such records and in the manner of reporting to the centralized criminal history record information system;

Tabulate, analyze, and interpret the data collected;

Supply data, at their request, to participating federal bureaus, departments, or criminal justice agencies engaged in the administration of criminal justice programs; and

Annually present to the Governor, on or before July 1, concerning the criminal statistics of the preceding calendar year, and present at such other times as the commissioner may deem wise, or the Governor may request, reports on special aspects of criminal statistics. A sufficient number of copies of all reports shall be printed for general distribution in the interest of public enlightenment.

History.

Enact. Acts 1968, ch. 128, § 3; 1970, ch. 92, § 4; 1974, ch. 74, Art. V, § 24(9); 1976, ch. 191, § 4; 2007, ch. 85, § 81, effective June 26, 2007.

17.148.
Duties of Department of Kentucky State Police regarding traffic safety — Control of funds.

The Justice and Public Safety Cabinet, Department of Kentucky State Police, shall:

Coordinate all efforts of the state’s various departments and agencies to promote traffic safety and make recommendations regarding the prevention of unnecessary duplications of these efforts;

Cooperate with all organizations, public or private, in the encouragement and promotion of traffic safety education in all forms; and

Receive, control, and expend, in accordance with the general provisions of the Kentucky Revised Statutes governing financial administration of all state agencies, grants and funds from either public or private sources.

There are hereby transferred to and vested in the Department of Kentucky State Police all functions, powers, duties, funds, personnel, equipment, and supplies relating to the administration of the National Highway Safety Act of 1966 in Kentucky, which responsibility and authority have been conferred upon the Transportation Cabinet.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 184, § 7, effective July 15, 1982; 2007, ch. 85, § 82, effective June 26, 2007.

17.150.
Reports by law enforcement officers and criminal justice agencies — Public inspection exemptions — Administrative regulations — Information from the Court of Justice.

Every sheriff, chief of police, coroner, jailer, prosecuting attorney, probation officer, parole officer; warden or superintendent of a prison, reformatory, correctional school, mental hospital, or institution for the intellectually disabled; Department of Kentucky State Police; state fire marshal; Board of Alcoholic Beverage Control; Cabinet for Health and Family Services; Transportation Cabinet; Department of Corrections; Department of Juvenile Justice; and every other person or criminal justice agency, except the Court of Justice and the Department of Public Advocacy, public or private, dealing with crimes or criminals or with delinquency or delinquents, when requested by the cabinet, shall:

Install and maintain records needed for reporting data required by the cabinet;

Report to the cabinet as and when the cabinet requests all data demanded by it, except that the reports concerning a juvenile delinquent shall not reveal the juvenile’s or the juvenile’s parents’ identity;

Give the cabinet or its accredited agent access for purpose of inspection; and

Cooperate with the cabinet to the end that its duties may be properly performed.

Intelligence and investigative reports maintained by criminal justice agencies are subject to public inspection if prosecution is completed or a determination not to prosecute has been made. However, portions of the records may be withheld from inspection if the inspection would disclose:

The name or identity of any confidential informant or information which may lead to the identity of any confidential informant;

Information of a personal nature, the disclosure of which will not tend to advance a wholesome public interest or a legitimate private interest;

Information which may endanger the life or physical safety of law enforcement personnel; or

Information contained in the records to be used in a prospective law enforcement action.

When a demand for the inspection of the records is refused by the custodian of the record, the burden shall be upon the custodian to justify the refusal of inspection with specificity. Exemptions provided by this section shall not be used by the custodian of the records to delay or impede the exercise of rights granted by this section.

Centralized criminal history records are not subject to public inspection. Centralized history records mean information on individuals collected and compiled by the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet from criminal justice agencies and maintained in a central location consisting of identifiable descriptions and notations of arrests, detentions, indictments, information, or other formal criminal charges and any disposition arising therefrom, including sentencing, correctional supervision, and release. The information shall be restricted to that recorded as the result of the initiation of criminal proceedings or any proceeding related thereto. Nothing in this subsection shall apply to documents maintained by criminal justice agencies which are the source of information collected by the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet. Criminal justice agencies shall retain the documents and no official thereof shall willfully conceal or destroy any record with intent to violate the provisions of this section.

The provisions of KRS Chapter 61 dealing with administrative and judicial remedies for inspection of public records and penalties for violations thereof shall be applicable to this section.

The secretary of justice and public safety shall adopt the administrative regulations necessary to carry out the provisions of the criminal history record information system and to insure the accuracy of the information based upon recommendations submitted by the commissioner, Department of Kentucky State Police.

The Administrative Office of the Courts may, upon suitable agreement between the Chief Justice and the secretary of justice and public safety, supply criminal justice information and data to the cabinet. No information, other than that required by KRS

27A.350

to

27A.420

and

27A.440

, shall be solicited from a circuit clerk, justice or judge, court, or agency of the Court of Justice unless the solicitation or request for information is made pursuant to an agreement which may have been reached between the Chief Justice and the secretary of justice and public safety.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1968, ch. 128, § 4; 1974, ch. 74, Art. VI, § 31; 1976, ch. 191, § 5; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 5, effective January 2, 1978; 1978, ch. 61, § 1, effective June 17, 1978; 1986, ch. 331, § 11, effective July 15, 1986; 1986, ch. 389, § 27, effective July 15, 1986; 1992, ch. 211, § 5, effective July 14, 1992; 1998, ch. 426, § 74, effective July 15, 1998; 1998, ch. 606, § 14, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 99, § 15, effective June 20, 2005; 2007, ch. 85, § 83, effective June 26, 2007; 2010, ch. 141, § 2, effective July 15, 2010; 2017 ch. 167, § 7, effective June 29, 2017.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(6/26/2007). Although 2007 Ky. Acts ch. 85, sec. 83, contains a reference to the “Department of Public Advocacy,” the entity created by 2007 Ky. Acts ch. 85, secs. 7 and 40, and Executive Order 2006-805 is the “Department for Public Advocacy.” In accordance with 2007 Ky. Acts ch. 85, sec. 335, and KRS

7.136

, the erroneous reference in this section has been corrected in codification.

17.151.
Centralized criminal history record information system to be developed by Department of Kentucky State Police, in cooperation with specified state agencies — Contents — Access — Identification numbers.

The Department of Kentucky State Police shall, in cooperation with the Administrative Office of the Courts, the Department of Juvenile Justice, the Cabinet for Health and Family Services, and the Department of Corrections, be responsible for the recording of those data elements that are needed for development of the centralized criminal history record information system.

The database shall at a minimum contain the information required in KRS

27A.310

to

27A.440

.

The Department of Kentucky State Police shall provide access to the Administrative Office of the Courts, the Department of Juvenile Justice, the Cabinet for Health and Family Services, and the Department of Corrections to its database.

The Department of Kentucky State Police, the Department of Juvenile Justice, the Cabinet for Health and Family Services, and the Department of Corrections shall assign the same identification number or other variable to each person whose name appears in the database.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 389, § 1, effective July 15, 1986; 1992, ch. 211, § 6, effective July 14, 1992; 1998, ch. 606, § 12, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 99, § 90, effective June 20, 2005; 2007, ch. 85, § 84, effective June 26, 2007.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(6/26/2007). The numbering of subsections in this section has been altered by the Reviser of Statutes from the numbering in 2007 Ky. Acts ch. 85, sec. 84, under the authority of KRS

7.136

.

17.152.
Citation and personal identification numbers to be supplied by Department of Kentucky State Police, Administrative Office of the Courts, Department of Juvenile Justice, and Cabinet for Health and Family Services.

All data supplied to the centralized criminal history record information system by the Department of Kentucky State Police, Administrative Office of the Courts, the Department of Juvenile Justice, the Cabinet for Health and Family Services, and the Department of Corrections shall be compatible with the system and shall contain both citation and personal identification numbers.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 389, § 5, effective July 15, 1986; 1992, ch. 211, § 7, effective July 14, 1992; 1998, ch. 606, § 13, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 99, § 91, effective June 20, 2005; 2007, ch. 85, § 85, effective June 26, 2007.

17.1521.
Uniform citation number to be supplied by Administrative Office of Courts.

All data supplied to the centralized criminal history record information system by the Administrative Office of the Courts shall include the uniform citation number applicable to the information reported.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 389, § 6, effective July 15, 1986.

17.1522.
Department of Kentucky State Police to update database within thirty days of receipt of information from certain levels.

The Department of Kentucky State Police shall update the centralized criminal history record information system within thirty (30) days of receipt of information. The update shall include information from the:

Offender level;

Arrest level; and

Informational and evaluational level.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 389, § 25, effective July 15, 1986; 2007, ch. 85, § 86, effective June 26, 2007.

17.1523.
Uniform offense report to provide for indication of bias-related crime — Annual reporting.

The uniform offense report shall contain provisions for obtaining information as to whether or not specific crimes appear from their facts and circumstances to be caused as a result of or reasonably related to race, color, religion, sex, or national origin.

All law enforcement officers, when completing a uniform offense report, shall note thereon whether or not the offense appears to be caused as a result of or reasonably related to race, color, religion, sex, or national origin or attempts to victimize or intimidate another due to any of the foregoing causes.

The Justice and Public Safety Cabinet shall, annually, as a part of the crime reports report on crimes which appear to have been caused by the factors cited in subsections (1) and (2) of this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 413, § 2, effective July 14, 1992; 2007, ch. 85, § 87, effective June 26, 2007.

17.153.
Annual report.

The annual report of the department shall contain statistics showing:

The number and type of offenses known to public authorities;

The personal and social characteristics of criminals and delinquents; and

The administrative action taken by law enforcement, judicial, penal, and correctional agencies in dealing with criminals and delinquents.

The department shall also interpret such statistics and so present the information that it may be of value in guiding the Legislature and those in charge of the apprehension, prosecution, and treatment of criminals and delinquents, or those concerned with the prevention of crime and delinquency. The report shall include statistics that are comparable with national criminal statistics published by federal agencies heretofore mentioned.

History.

Enact. Acts 1968, ch. 128, § 5; 1974, ch. 74, Art. V, § 24(9); 1976, ch. 191, § 6.

17.1531.
Study on racial bias in capital sentencing. [Repealed.]

17.157.
Funds withheld for failure to comply.

If any public official or employee, except justices, judges, circuit clerks, and employees of the Court of Justice, required to report to the department neglects or refuses to comply with the requests of the department, or its rules governing record systems and their maintenance, the department chief shall give written notice thereof to the person or persons authorized by law to disburse funds of the governmental agency to the public official or employee involved. No funds of the governmental agency shall thereafter be paid to the public official or employee, whether in the form of salary, fees, expenses, compensation, or otherwise, until the department chief notifies the disbursing authority that performance of the required duty has been completed.

History.

Enact. Acts 1968, ch. 128, § 6; 1974, ch. 74, Art. V, § 24(9); 1976, ch. 191, § 7; 1978, ch. 61, § 2, effective June 17, 1978; 1978, ch. 384, § 4, effective June 17, 1978.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

This section was amended by two 1978 Acts which do not appear to be in conflict and which have been compiled together.

17.160.
Furnishing potential employer with person’s record of convictions, guilty pleas, and Alford pleas involving specified crimes.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, an employer may request from the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet or the Administrative Office of the Courts, or both, records of all available convictions involving any felony offense, any misdemeanor offense in KRS Chapter 531 or KRS Chapter 510, any misdemeanor offense under KRS Chapter 218A committed within the five (5) years immediately preceding the application, or any conviction for violating KRS Chapter 189A committed within the five (5) years immediately preceding the application of a person who applies for employment or volunteers for a position in which he or she would have supervisory or disciplinary power over a minor. The cabinet or the Administrative Office of the Courts, as appropriate, shall furnish the information to the requesting employer and shall also send a copy of the information to the applicant.

Any request for records under subsection (1) of this section shall be on a form approved by the cabinet and the Administrative Office of the Courts. No fee shall be charged to the employer or to the person whose records were requested if funding for the record checks provided for in this section is provided through some other mechanism; otherwise the cabinet or the Administrative Office of the Courts may charge a fee to be paid by the organization making the request, not to exceed the actual cost of processing the request.

The cabinet and the Administrative Office of the Courts shall promulgate administrative regulations to implement the provisions of this section. No administrative regulation shall be adopted requiring or authorizing the fingerprinting of applicants.

As used in this section, “employer” means any organization chartered by the Congress of the United States or specified by the Attorney General which employs or uses the services of volunteers or paid employees in positions in which the volunteer or employee has supervisory or disciplinary power over a child or children. An organization which has an administrative office with paid personnel which has jurisdiction over suborganizations in one (1) or more counties shall make application for record checks through the administrative office of the organization and not through each individual suborganization.

Offenses which may be searched for under this section are ones involving any conviction, plea of guilty, or Alford plea, to any offense specified in subsection (1) of this section or the attempted violation of any offense specified in subsection (1) of this section. Conviction for a violation or attempted violation of an offense committed outside the Commonwealth of Kentucky is a crime if such offense would have been a crime in Kentucky under subsection (1) of this section if committed in Kentucky.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 382, § 10, effective July 13, 1984; 1996, ch. 290, § 1, effective July 15, 1996; 2007, ch. 85, § 88, effective June 26, 2007.

17.165.
Definitions — Criminal record check for job applicants at child-care centers — Restrictions on employing violent offenders or persons convicted of sex crimes — Conviction information for applicant seeking employment as child-serving professional.

As used in this section, “sex crime” means a conviction or a plea of guilty to a sex crime specified in KRS

17.500

.

As used in this section, “violent offender” means any person who has been convicted of or pled guilty to the commission of a capital offense, Class A felony, or Class B felony involving the death of the victim, or rape in the first degree or sodomy in the first degree of the victim or serious physical injury to a victim.

As used in this section, “violent crime” shall mean a conviction of or a plea of guilty to the commission of a capital offense, Class A felony, or Class B felony involving the death of the victim, or rape in the first degree or sodomy in the first degree of the victim or serious physical injury to a victim.

As used in this section, “criminal offense against a victim who is a minor” means a conviction of or a plea of guilty to a criminal offense against a victim who is a minor as specified in KRS 17.500(3).

Excluding a child care staff member pursuant to KRS

199.8965

, the provisions of this section shall apply to all applicants for initial employment in a position which involves care and supervision of a minor as a child- serving professional on or after March 27, 2017.

Each employer of an applicant for initial employment in a position which involves care and supervision of a minor as a child-serving professional shall request all conviction information for the applicant for employment from the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet or the Administrative Office of the Courts prior to employing the applicant.

This subsection shall not be construed to apply to an employer of a minor.

No employee in a position which involves care and supervision of a minor as a child-serving professional pursuant to subsection (5) of this section shall have been convicted of a violent crime, a criminal offense against a victim who is a minor, or a sex crime, or have been found by the Cabinet for Health and Family Services or a court to have abused or neglected a child.

Each application form, provided by the employer to the applicant, shall conspicuously state the following: “FOR THIS TYPE OF EMPLOYMENT, STATE LAW REQUIRES A CRIMINAL RECORD CHECK AS A CONDITION OF EMPLOYMENT.”

Any request for records under subsection (5) of this section shall be on a form approved by the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet or the Administrative Office of the Courts, and the cabinet may charge a fee to be paid by the applicant in an amount no greater than the actual cost of processing the request.

History.

Repealed, reenact. and amend. Acts 1988, ch. 345, § 1, effective July 15, 1988; 2000, ch. 308, § 25, effective July 14, 2000; 2005, ch. 99, § 92, effective June 20, 2005; 2006, ch. 182, § 1, effective July 12, 2006; 2007, ch. 85, § 89, effective June 26, 2007; 2017 ch. 135, § 1, effective March 27, 2017.

17.167.
Felony-offender record check for employees and members of fire departments, ambulance services, and rescue squads.

As used in this section, “felony offender” means any person who has been convicted of, entered an Alford plea to, or pleaded guilty to the commission of a capital offense or a felony.

Any paid or volunteer fire department certified by the Kentucky Fire Commission, ambulance service licensed by the Commonwealth of Kentucky, or rescue squad officially affiliated with a local disaster and emergency services organization or with the Division of Emergency Management may apply to the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet or the Administrative Office of the Courts for a felony offender record check on applicants for employment or membership with the fire department, ambulance service, or rescue squad.

Each application form, provided by a fire department, ambulance service, or rescue squad to an applicant for employment or membership, shall conspicuously state the following:

“FOR EMPLOYMENT WITH OR MEMBERSHIP WITH A FIRE DEPARTMENT, AMBULANCE SERVICE, OR RESCUE SQUAD, STATE LAW PERMITS A CRIMINAL RECORD CHECK AS A CONDITION OF EMPLOYMENT OR MEMBERSHIP.”

Any request for records under this section shall be on a form approved by the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet or the Administrative Office of the Courts. The Justice and Public Safety Cabinet and the Administrative Office of the Courts shall not charge a fee for making record checks.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1996, ch. 373, § 1, effective July 15, 1996; 2000, ch. 102, § 2, effective July 14, 2000; 2007, ch. 85, § 90, effective June 26, 2007; 2020 ch. 67, § 2, effective July 15, 2020.